District of Columbia statutes.
16-3112

Costs and execution.

The Probate Court may render judgment for costs against the unsuccessful party in any proceeding conducted in the court, and issue execution thereof.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 601, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Sept. 6, 1980, D.C. Law 3-85, § 5(c), 27 DCR 2900
Fees and costs in civil proceedings, see § 15-701 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 16-3112.
1973 Ed., § 16-3113.